Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.770

Manufacturing—Workforce innovation sector lead—Reports.

(1) The department must appoint a workforce innovation sector lead, to coordinate workforce activities and needs identified by industry sector leads such as the manufacturing, clean technology, and aerospace sector leads, and connect this work with the lead workforce agencies to inform strategic allocation of funding.

(2) Within existing resources, the department must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature beginning December 1, 2022, and continuing every fourth year thereafter, the progress made in developing, recruiting, and retaining research and development employers and workforce; and a description of how the state's policy toolkit for developing strength in research and development as a sector compares to competitor states.

[ 2021 c 64 s 6.]

NOTES:

Short title—2021 c 64: See note following RCW 43.330.760.